Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,129
University of Nebraska Eppley Science Hall Construction Fund; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that four hundred seventy-five thousand dollars be appropriated from the University of Nebraska Eppley Science Hall Construction Fund for fiscal year 1991-92, for the University of Nebraska Eppley Science Hall construction project, which project shall include the addition of five floors in the existing Eppley Science Hall to expand research and related activities at the University of Nebraska Medical Center.

Laws 1990, LB 1220, § 4.